hu: A sárvédő felületének állapota: Csupasz/festetlen; Szénszálas hatású; Króm; Festett; Porfestett; Előre festett (színre fújt); Alapozott; Strukturált; Nyers; Egyéb
sv: Ytbehandlingsstatus för skärm: Obehandlad/omålad; Kolfiberlook; Krom; Målad; Pulverlackerad; Förmålad (färgmatchad); Grundmålad; Strukturerad; Obehandlad; Övrigt
en: Fender finish state: Bare/unpainted; Carbon fiber look; Chrome; Painted; Powder coated; Pre-painted (color matched); Primed; Textured; Unfinished; Other
pt-BR: Estado do acabamento do para-lama: Cru/sem pintura; Efeito fibra de carbono; Cromado; Pintado; Com pintura a pó; Pré-pintado (na cor do veículo); Com primer; Texturizado; Sem acabamento; Outro
lt-LT: Sparno apdailos būsena: Be apdailos / nedažytas; Anglies pluošto išvaizda; Chromo; Dažytas; Dažytas milteliniu būdu; Iš anksto nudažytas (suderinta spalva); Gruntuotas; Tekstūrinis; Be apdailos; Kitas
cs: Stav povrchové úpravy blatníku: Holé/nelakované; Vzhled uhlíkových vláken; Chromované; Lakované; Práškově lakované; Předem lakované (sladěná barva); Opatřené základním nátěrem; S texturou; Bez povrchové úpravy; Jiné
fr: État de finition de l’aile: Nu/non peint; Effet fibre de carbone; Chromé; Peint; Thermolaqué; Pré-peint (couleur assortie); Avec apprêt; Texturé; Brut; Autre
ru: Состояние отделки поверхности крыла: Без покрытия / неокрашенное; Под углеродное волокно (карбон); Хром; Окрашенное; С порошковым покрытием; Предварительно окрашенное (в цвет); Загрунтованное; Текстурированное; Без отделки; Другое
ko: 펜더 마감 상태: 노출/무도장; 탄소 섬유 룩; 크롬; 도장됨; 분체 도장; 사전 도장(색상 일치); 프라이머 처리됨; 질감 처리됨; 미마감; 기타
zh-TW: 葉子板表面處理狀態: 裸色/未上漆; 碳纖維外觀; 鍍鉻; 已上漆; 粉體烤漆; 預先上漆 (配色); 已上底漆; 紋理; 未加工; 其他
da: Skærmens overfladebehandling: Bar/umalet; Kulfiber-look; Krom; Malet; Pulverlakeret; Formalet (farvetilpasset); Grundet; Tekstureret; Ubehandlet; Andet
tr: Çamurluğun kaplama durumu: Çıplak/boyanmamış; Karbon fiber görünümlü; Krom; Boyalı; Toz boyalı; Önceden boyanmış (renk uyumlu); Astarlanmış; Dokulu; İşlem görmemiş; Diğer
fi: Lokasuojan viimeistelyn tila: Paljas/maalaamaton; Hiilikuitu-look; Kromi; Maalattu; Jauhemaalattu; Valmiiksi maalattu (sävy sävyyn); Pohjamaalattu; Teksturoitu; Viimeistelemätön; Muu
pl: Stan wykończenia błotnika: Surowy / niemalowany; Wygląd włókna węglowego; Chromowany; Malowany; Malowany proszkowo; Wstępnie malowany (dopasowany do koloru); Zagruntowany; Teksturowany; Niewykończony; Inny
sl-SI: Stanje zaključka blatnika: Golo/nebarvano; Videz ogljikovih vlaken; Krom; Barvano; Prašno barvano; Predhodno barvano (v barvi vozila); Osnovni premaz; Teksturirano; Nedokončano; Drugo
it: Stato di finitura del parafango: Nudo/Non verniciato; Effetto fibra di carbonio; Cromato; Verniciato; Verniciato a polvere; Pre-verniciato (in tinta); Con primer; Testurizzato; Grezzo; Altro
sk-SK: Stav povrchovej úpravy blatníka: Bez povrchovej úpravy/nenalakovaný; Vzhľad uhlíkových vlákien; Chróm; Lakovaný; Prášková farba; Predlakovaný (vo farbe); Základný náter; Štruktúrovaný; Bez povrchovej úpravy; Iný
zh-CN: 护板表面处理状态: 裸露/未喷漆; 碳纤维外观; 镀铬; 喷漆; 粉末涂层; 预喷漆（同色系）; 底漆; 纹理表面; 未加工; 其他
nl: Spatbord afwerkingsstaat: Kaal/ongelakt; Koolstofvezel-look; Chroom; Gelakt; Gepoedercoat; Voorgelakt (in kleur); Gegrond; Met structuur; Onbehandeld; Overig
ja: フェンダーの塗装状態: むき出し/未塗装; カーボンファイバー調; クローム; 塗装済み; 粉体塗装; 塗装済み (カラーマッチ); プライマー塗装済み; テクスチャー仕上げ; 未仕上げ; その他
el: Κατάσταση φινιρίσματος φτερού: Γυμνό/άβαφο; Εμφάνιση ανθρακονημάτων; Χρώμιο; Βαμμένο; Με ηλεκτροστατική βαφή; Προβαμμένο (στο ίδιο χρώμα); Ασταρωμένο; Με υφή; Χωρίς φινίρισμα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Estado de acabamento da Fender: Nu/não pintado; Aspeto de fibra de carbono; Cromado; Pintado; Revestimento em pó; Pré-pintado (cor correspondente); Com primário; Texturado; Sem acabamento; Outro
hr-HR: Stanje završne obrade blatobrana: Golo / neobojeno; Izgled ugljičnih vlakana; Kromirano; Obojeno; Premazano prahom; Prethodno obojeno (boja usklađena); S temeljnim premazom; Teksturirano; Nedovršeno; Ostalo
nb: Fenderens overflatetilstand: Bar/umalt; Karbonfiber-look; Krom; Lakkert; Pulverlakkert; Forhåndslakkert (fargetilpasset); Grunnet; Teksturert; Ubehandlet; Annet
th: สถานะการตกแต่งผิวของบังโคลน: เปลือย/ไม่ทำสี; ลายคาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; โครเมียม; ทำสีแล้ว; เคลือบสีฝุ่น; ทำสีล่วงหน้า (สีเข้าชุด); รองพื้นแล้ว; มีพื้นผิว; ไม่ตกแต่งพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Starea finisajului apărătoarelor: Netratat/nevopsit; Aspect de fibră de carbon; Cromat; Vopsit; Vopsit în câmp electrostatic; Prevopsit (culoare asortată); Grunduit; Texturat; Nefinisat; Altele
bg-BG: Състояние на финиша на калника: Гол/небоядисан; Карбонов вид; Хром; Боядисан; Прахово боядисан; Предварително боядисан (съответстващ цвят); Грундиран; Текстуриран; Необработен; Друго
vi: Tình trạng hoàn thiện của tấm chắn: Trần/không sơn; Vân sợi carbon; Mạ chrome; Đã sơn; Sơn tĩnh điện; Sơn sẵn (chỉnh khớp màu); Phủ sơn lót; Có vân; Chưa hoàn thiện; Khác
de: Lackierungszustand des Kotflügels: Blank/unlackiert; Carbonfaser-Optik; Chrom; Lackiert; Pulverbeschichtet; Vorlackiert (farblich abgestimmt); Grundiert; Strukturiert; Unbehandelt; Sonstige
es: Estado de acabado del guardabarros: Crudo/sin pintar; Aspecto de fibra de carbono; Cromo; Pintado; Con revestimiento en polvo; Prepintado (a juego); Imprimado; Texturizado; Sin terminar; Otro